Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3163.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-60 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-60. Sealing and unsealing of court files.
(a) Actions arising under §§ 34-18-35, 34-18-36, and 34-18-38 may be sealed by the court
upon motion by any party or parties filed at least thirty (30) days after the expiration of the appeal
period following the conclusion of the underlying civil action.
(b) In ruling on the motion to seal, the court shall grant the motion and seal the record of
the civil action upon a finding that the underlying civil action was dismissed as a result of a motion
to dismiss, the action was resolved by stipulation and the terms of the stipulation have been satisfied
by the parties, any monetary judgment against the moving party has been satisfied in full, or the
action has been dismissed for lack of prosecution after a five-year (5) period. The court shall also
make a finding that the moving party notified all parties to the underlying civil action of their
motion to seal the record and that motion is the only request made under this section by the moving
party within the previous five (5) years.
(c) Any party to an action arising under §§ 34-18-35, 34-18-36, and 34-18-38 may file a
motion to seal the record of the action upon satisfaction of the requirements set forth in subsections
(a) and (b) of this section. Parties requesting seal of their record under this section are limited to
one request every five (5) years.
(d) In ruling on a motion to seal when a civil action is dismissed for either a defective

complaint and/or lack of jurisdiction of the court, the court shall grant the motion and seal the
record, however, the sealing of an eviction record under this subsection shall not be counted when
considering a moving party’s eligibility to request the sealing of one eviction record in five (5)
years as set forth in this section.
(e) The court shall seal the record, following the expiration of any appeal period, when a
tenant prevails following a hearing or trial before the court, however, the sealing of an eviction
record under this subsection shall not be counted when considering a moving party’s eligibility to
request the sealing of one eviction record in five (5) years as set forth in this section.
(f)(1) Upon motion of a person who was between eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21) years
of age at the time an eviction action was commenced, the court may order the sealing of that
person's association with the eviction record if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that:
(i) The person was not a party to any lease, rental agreement, or other contractual obligation
for payment of rent;
(ii) The person was not financially responsible for rent, occupancy charges, or other
obligations arising from the tenancy; and
(iii) The person was named in the eviction action solely because the person resided at the
premises and applicable law required all adult occupants to be named in the proceeding.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, "dependent" means an individual who was principally
supported by a parent, guardian, or other tenant of record and who did not assume financial
responsibility for the tenancy.
(3) An order entered pursuant to this subsection shall seal only the eligible individual's
association with the eviction action and shall not seal, expunge, or otherwise restrict public access
to the underlying court file, docket, judgment, or orders.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall impair, limit, delay, or otherwise affect the validity,
collection, execution, recording, or enforcement of any judgment entered in the action.
(5) No order shall issue under this subsection unless the judiciary has established a
mechanism capable of sealing only the eligible individual's association with the eviction action
without sealing the underlying case record.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006154/SUB A
========
LC006154/SUB A - Page 2 of 3